Nevada, session 83, AB103.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 315 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Serviceman” or “servicewoman” means a person
who is presently serving in the Armed Forces of the United States.
Sec. 3. 1. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more
but less than 700,000, an authority may form a regional authority.
2. To form a regional authority as described in subsection 1,
the governing body of the county and the governing body of each
city and town located within the county that desires to participate
in the regional authority shall adopt a resolution setting forth:
(a) The intent to regionalize some or all of their powers;
(b) A reference to the development plan for transitioning any
existing authority to a regional authority;
(c) The geographic scope of the regional authority; and
(d) Such other matters as the governing bodies determine to be
necessary or advisable.
3. If the formation of a regional authority pursuant to this
section involves fiscal matters, the ownership of real property or
the consolidation of functions, the governing bodies who form the
regional authority shall, in consultation with the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development, resolve such
matters by written contract, agreement or other arrangement
entered into by those governing bodies. Upon the adoption of a
resolution pursuant to subsection 2 forming a regional authority,
the dissolution of any individual authority of the local
governments who form the regional authority must be initiated.
Sec. 4. 1. Upon the adoption of a resolution pursuant to
section 3 of this act forming a regional authority, seven persons
must be appointed to serve as commissioners of the authority as
follows:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(a) Two persons appointed by the governing body of the
county;
(b) Two persons appointed by the governing body of the largest
city in the county that participates in the authority;
(c) Two persons appointed by the governing body of the second
largest city in the county that participates in the regional
authority; and
(d) One person who must be a current recipient of assistance
from the authority appointed by the executive director of the
authority. The initial appointment made pursuant to this section
may be a recipient of assistance from any authority which was
dissolved by resolution pursuant to section 3 of this act to form the
regional authority.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, each
commissioner must be appointed for a term of office of 4 years.
3. Of the two commissioners appointed pursuant to
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1, respectively:
(a) One commissioner must be appointed to an initial term of 2
years; and
(b) One commissioner must be appointed to an initial term of 3
years.
4. If, during his or her term, the commissioner appointed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 ceases to be a recipient
of assistance of the authority, the commissioner must be replaced
in the manner set forth in subsection 1 by a person who is a
recipient of assistance.
5. All vacancies must be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
Sec. 5. 1. A regional authority formed pursuant to section 3
of this act may, in addition to exercising the powers set forth in
NRS 315.440 and 315.460 and any other relevant provisions of
this chapter:
(a) Jointly, or with another authority, exercise any powers,
privileges and rights that are exercised or capable of being
exercised by a local housing agency of this State.
(b) Create a business entity which has as its principal purpose
the development, operation or management of housing projects.
The authority or any business entity created by the authority
pursuant to this paragraph may hold an ownership interest in a
business entity created pursuant to this subsection and participate
in matters of corporate governance for that business entity. The
meetings of a business entity are not subject to the provisions of
chapter 241 of NRS.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(c) Enter into a public-private partnership to finance a
housing project.
(d) Construct or operate a housing project for profit.
(e) Exercise such other powers as the governing bodies of the
local governments that formed the regional authority may agree
upon.
2. As used in this section, “business entity” means a
corporation, whether or not for profit, nonprofit organization,
association, partnership, limited-liability company, limited-liability
partnership or other entity formed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 6. NRS 315.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.021 As used in NRS 315.021 to 315.071, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires:
1. “Housing authority” means a housing authority created
pursuant to this chapter. The term includes a regional authority
formed pursuant to NRS 315.7805 [.] or section 3 of this act.
2. “Landlord” means a person who owns or manages any
premises that he or she rents or leases to a tenant pursuant to a
contract with a housing authority.
3. “Premises” means a particular apartment or other residential
unit of public housing occupied by a tenant, or a residential unit that
is occupied by a tenant pursuant to a federally assisted housing
program administered by a housing authority.
4. “Public housing” means the residential accommodations
operated by a housing authority or a landlord.
Sec. 7. NRS 315.041 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.041 1. Except as otherwise required by federal law or
regulation, or as a condition to the receipt of federal money, a
housing authority or a landlord shall, immediately upon learning of
facts indicating that a tenant is required pursuant to NRS 315.031 to
vacate public housing, serve upon the tenant a written notice which:
(a) States that the tenancy is terminated at noon of the fifth full
day following the day of service, and that the tenant must surrender
the premises at or before that time;
(b) Sets forth the facts upon which the tenant is required to
vacate the premises pursuant to NRS 315.031;
(c) Advises the tenant of the tenant’s right to contest the matter
by filing, within 5 days, an affidavit with the justice of the peace
denying the occurrence of the conditions set forth in NRS 315.031;
and
(d) Contains any other matter required by federal law or
regulation regarding the eviction of the tenant from those premises,
or as a condition to the receipt of federal money.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
 If the tenant timely files the affidavit and provides the housing
authority or the landlord with a copy of the affidavit, stamped as
filed with the justice of the peace, the housing authority or the
landlord shall not refuse the tenant, or any person who resides with
the tenant, access to the premises.
2. Upon noncompliance with the notice:
(a) The housing authority or the landlord shall apply by affidavit
to the justice of the peace of the township where the premises are
located. If it appears to the justice of the peace that the conditions
set forth in NRS 315.031 have occurred and that the tenant is
required by that section to vacate the premises, the justice of the
peace shall issue an order directing the sheriff or constable of the
county to remove the tenant and any other person on the premises
within 24 hours after receipt of the order. The affidavit required by
this paragraph must contain:
(1) The date when, and the facts upon which, the tenant
became required to vacate the premises.
(2) The date when the written notice was given, a copy of the
notice and a statement that the notice was served as provided in
NRS 315.051.
(b) Except when the tenant has timely filed the affidavit
described in subsection 1 and provides the housing authority or the
landlord with a copy of the affidavit, stamped as filed with the
justice of the peace, the housing authority or the landlord may, in a
peaceable manner, refuse the tenant, and any person who resides
with the tenant, access to the premises.
3. Upon the filing by the tenant of the affidavit authorized by
subsection 1 and the filing by the housing authority or the landlord
of the affidavit required by subsection 2, the justice of the peace
shall hold a hearing, after service of notice of the hearing upon the
parties, to determine the truthfulness and sufficiency of any affidavit
or notice provided for in this section. If the justice of the peace
determines that the conditions set forth in NRS 315.031 have
occurred and that the tenant is required by that section to vacate the
premises, the justice of the peace shall issue a summary order for
removal of the tenant and any other person on the premises, or an
order refusing the tenant, and any person who resides with the
tenant, admittance to the premises. If the justice of the peace
determines that the conditions set forth in NRS 315.031 have not
occurred and that the tenant is not required by that section to vacate
the premises, the justice of the peace shall refuse to grant any relief.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
4. The provisions of NRS 40.215 to 40.425, inclusive, do not
apply to any proceeding brought pursuant to the provisions of NRS
[315.011] 315.021 to 315.071, inclusive.
Sec. 8. NRS 315.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.140 NRS 315.140 to 315.7813, inclusive, and sections 2 to
5, inclusive, of this act may be referred to as the Housing
Authorities Law of 1947.
Sec. 9. NRS 315.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.150 Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions
contained in NRS 315.160 to 315.300, inclusive, and section 2 of
this act govern the construction of NRS 315.140 to 315.7813,
inclusive [.] , and sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 10. NRS 315.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.160 1. In the case of an authority of a city or town, “area
of operation” shall include such city or town and the area within 5
miles of the territorial boundaries thereof; but the area of operation
of an authority of any city or town shall not include any area which
lies within the territorial boundaries of some other city or town as
herein defined, unless a resolution shall have been adopted by the
governing body of such other city or town (and by any authority
which shall have been theretofore established and authorized to
exercise its powers in such city or town) declaring that there is a
need for such authority to exercise its powers within that city or
town.
2. In the case of an authority of a county, “area of operation”
shall include all of the county for which it is created; but a county
authority shall not undertake any housing project or projects within
the boundaries of any city or town, as herein defined, unless a
resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such
city or town (and by any authority which shall have been theretofore
established and authorized to exercise its powers in such city or
town) declaring that there is a need for the county authority to
exercise its powers within such city or town.
3. In the case of a regional authority, “area of operation” shall
include:
(a) All of the territory within the geographic scope of the
regional authority, as referred to in paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of
NRS 315.7805 [;] or paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of section 3 of
this act; and
(b) Any other territory regarding which the regional authority
and another authority agree to exercise joint power or control.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 11. NRS 315.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.275 “Regional authority” means an authority formed
pursuant to NRS 315.7805 [.] or section 3 of this act.
Sec. 12. NRS 315.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.300 “Veteran” [or “serviceman or servicewoman” means a
person who has served in the Armed Forces of the United States at
any time:
1. On or after April 6, 1917, and prior to November 11, 1918;
2. On or after September 16, 1940, and prior to July 26, 1947;
3. On or after June 27, 1950, and prior to January 31, 1955;
and
4. On or after August 5, 1964, and prior to such date thereafter
as shall be determined by Presidential proclamation or concurrent
resolution of the Congress as the end of the Vietnam era,
 and, in the case of a veteran, has been discharged or released
therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, or in the case of
a serviceman or servicewoman, is presently in the Armed Forces of
the United States.] has the meaning ascribed to it in 38 U.S.C.
§ 101(2).
Sec. 13. NRS 315.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.380 1. An authority shall select a chair and a vice chair
from its commissioners.
2. For the purpose of managing a regional authority [,] formed
pursuant to NRS 315.7805, the commissioners of the regional
authority shall initially select an executive director by way of a
competitive, open and public process. For the purpose of managing
a regional authority formed pursuant to section 3 of this act, the
executive director of the authority to be dissolved to form the
regional authority shall serve as the initial executive director of
the regional authority. Thereafter, the selection of an executive
director must be made as determined by the commissioners of the
regional authority to be in the best interests of the authority.
Sec. 14. NRS 315.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.390 1. A commissioner is entitled to necessary expenses,
including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of the
commissioner’s duties.
2. An authority may provide , by resolution [that] , for
compensation for each commissioner [is entitled to receive
compensation] of [$80] not more than $250 for each meeting of the
authority attended.
[3. No commissioner may receive as compensation more than
$240 in a calendar month.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
Sec. 15. NRS 315.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.420 An authority shall constitute a public body corporate
and politic, exercising public and essential governmental functions,
and having all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and
effectuate the purposes and provisions of NRS 315.140 to 315.7813,
inclusive, and sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act (but not the
power to levy and collect taxes or special assessments).
Sec. 16. NRS 315.435 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.435 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 315.9835, a
housing authority shall not operate in any area in which an authority
already established is operating without the consent by resolution of
the authority already operating therein. For the purposes of this
section, the formation of a regional authority [pursuant to NRS
315.7805] shall be deemed to constitute consent by resolution of the
authority of any participating local governmental entity.
Sec. 17. NRS 315.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.460 An authority may:
1. Lease or rent any land, dwellings, accommodations,
buildings, structures or facilities embraced in any housing project,
and establish and revise the rents or charges therefor.
2. Own, hold and improve real or personal property.
3. Purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant,
bequest, devise or otherwise any real or personal property or any
interest therein.
4. Acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any
real property pursuant to the provisions of the laws of Nevada and
rules of court relative to the right of eminent domain, civil actions,
new trials and appeals, which laws and rules shall be applicable to
and constitute the rules of practice in condemnation proceedings by
housing authorities.
5. Sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge or dispose of
any real or personal property or any interest therein.
6. Insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal
property or operations of the authority against any risks or hazards.
Sec. 18. NRS 315.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.500 1. It is declared to be the policy of this state that
each authority shall manage and operate its housing projects in an
efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the rentals or payments for
dwelling accommodations at low rates consistent with its providing
decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of
low income, and that no authority , except a regional authority
formed pursuant to section 3, shall construct or operate any
housing project for profit, or as a source of revenue to the city, town
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
or the county. To this end an authority shall fix the rentals or
payments for dwellings in its housing projects at no higher rates
than it shall find to be necessary in order to produce revenues which,
together with all other available moneys, revenues, income and
receipts of the authority from whatever sources derived, will be
sufficient:
[1.] (a) To pay, as the same become due, the principal and
interest on the bonds of the authority.
[2.] (b) To create and maintain such reserves as may be required
to assure the payment of principal and interest as it becomes due on
its bonds.
[3.] (c) To meet the cost of, and to provide for, maintaining and
operating the housing projects (including necessary reserves therefor
and the cost of any insurance) and the administrative expenses of the
authority.
[4.] (d) To make such payments in lieu of taxes as it determines
are consistent with the maintenance of the low-rent character of the
housing projects.
(e) To enhance the ability of the authority to meet its purposes,
including providing housing and services for low-income
households in the operation area of the authority.
2. For the purposes of this section, a housing project
constructed or operated by an authority that is eligible for low-
income housing pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 42 is not constructed or
operated for profit.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Prohibit a business entity created pursuant to section 5 of
this act from taking any authorized action; or
(b) Impose any restrictions on a business entity created by
section 6 of this act.
Sec. 19. NRS 315.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.510 1. In the operation or management of housing
projects, an authority shall at all times observe the following duties
with respect to rentals and tenant admissions:
[1.] (a) It may rent or lease the dwelling accommodations
therein only to persons of low income and, as among low-income
persons who are eligible applicants for occupancy in dwellings of
given sizes and at specified rents, shall extend [the following]
preferences in the selection of tenants [:
(a) First: To families who are to be displaced by any low-rent
housing project or by any public slum clearance or redevelopment
project initiated after January 1, 1947, or who were so displaced
within 3 years before making application on authority for admission
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
to any low-rent housing. Among such families, first preference must
be given to families of veterans with a disability whose disability
has been determined by the Department of Veterans Affairs to be
service connected, second preference must be given to families of
deceased veterans and servicemen or servicewomen whose death
has been determined by the Department of Veterans Affairs to be
service connected, and third preference must be given to families of
other veterans and servicemen or servicewomen.
(b) Second: To families of other veterans and servicemen or
servicewomen. Among such families, first preference must be given
to families of veterans with a disability whose disability has been
determined by the Department of Veterans Affairs to be service
connected, and second preference must be given to families of
deceased veterans and servicemen or servicewomen whose death
has been determined by the Department of Veterans Affairs to be
service connected.] as may be required by the Federal Government
pursuant to federal law or in any contract for financial assistance
with the authority.
[2.] (b) It may rent or lease to a tenant dwelling
accommodations consisting of a number of rooms, but no greater
number, which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary
accommodations to the proposed occupants thereof, without
overcrowding.
[3. An authority shall not accept any person or persons as
tenants in any housing project if the person or persons who occupy
the dwelling accommodations have, at the time of admission, an
aggregate annual net income, less an exemption of $200 for each
minor member of the family other than the head of the family and
his or her spouse, in excess of seven times the annual rental of the
quarters to be furnished such person or persons, but an authority
may agree to conditions as to tenant eligibility or preference
required by the Federal Government pursuant to federal law in any
contract for financial assistance with the authority.]
(c) In computing the rental for [this] the purpose of admitting
tenants, there must be included in the rental the average annual cost,
as determined by the authority, to occupants of heat, water,
electricity, gas, cooking fuel and other necessary services or
facilities, whether or not the charge for such services and facilities is
included in the rental.
2. The requirements of this section do not apply to a housing
project developed, operated or managed by a business entity
created pursuant to section 5 of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
Sec. 20. NRS 315.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.540 [An]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an authority
shall agree to make such payments in lieu of taxes to the city, town,
county, and the State, or any political subdivision, as it finds
consistent with the maintenance of the low-rent character of housing
projects or the achievement of the purposes of NRS 315.140 to
315.7813, inclusive [.] and sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act.
2. If a tax exemption is allowed for a housing project
pursuant to NRS 361.082, an authority is not required to make the
payment in lieu of taxes.
Sec. 21. NRS 315.980 is hereby amended to read as follows:
315.980 Each commissioner is entitled to receive
compensation of [$80] not more than $250 per day , as fixed by the
Authority, for attendance at meetings of the Authority.
Sec. 22. NRS 241.016 is hereby amended to read as follows:
241.016 1. The meetings of a public body that are quasi-
judicial in nature are subject to the provisions of this chapter.
2. The following are exempt from the requirements of this
chapter:
(a) The Legislature of the State of Nevada.
(b) Judicial proceedings, including, without limitation,
proceedings before the Commission on Judicial Selection and,
except as otherwise provided in NRS 1.4687, the Commission on
Judicial Discipline.
(c) Meetings of the State Board of Parole Commissioners when
acting to grant, deny, continue or revoke the parole of a prisoner or
to establish or modify the terms of the parole of a prisoner.
3. Any provision of law, including, without limitation, NRS
91.270, 219A.210, 223.966, 226.778, 228.495, 239C.140,
239C.420, 241.028, 281A.350, 281A.690, 281A.735, 281A.760,
284.3629, 286.150, 287.0415, 287.04345, 287.338, 288.220,
288.590, 289.387, 293.252, 295.121, 295.217, 315.98425, 360.247,
388.261, 388.385, 388A.495, 388C.150, 388D.355, 388G.710,
388G.730, 392.147, 392.466, 392.467, 392.4671, 394.1699,
396.1415, 396.3295, 414.270, 422.405, 427A.940, 433.534,
435.610, 442.774, 450.140, 450.635, 463.110, 480.545, 622.320,
622.340, 630.311, 630.336, 631.3635, 639.050, 642.518, 642.557,
686B.170, 696B.550, 703.196 and 706.1725, and section 5 of this
act, which:
(a) Provides that any meeting, hearing or other proceeding is not
subject to the provisions of this chapter; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(b) Otherwise authorizes or requires a closed meeting, hearing
or proceeding,
 prevails over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The exceptions provided to this chapter, and a remote
technology system or electronic communication, must not be used to
circumvent the spirit or letter of this chapter to deliberate or act,
outside of an open and public meeting, upon a matter over which the
public body has supervision, control, jurisdiction or advisory
powers.
Sec. 23. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
Sec. 24. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 25. NRS 315.011 and 315.580 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 26. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)